California, session 20252026, AB1293.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4062.4 is added to the Labor Code, to read:4062.4. (a) (1) The administrative director shall develop and make available a template qualified medical evaluator (QME) report form, which shall include all necessary statutory and regulatory requirements for a QME report.(2) Use of a template QME report form developed pursuant to paragraph (1) does not constitute prima facie evidence that a report is complete, accurate, or compliant with applicable statutory or regulatory requirements.(b) (1) The administrative director shall develop and make available a medical evaluation request form for communicating with a panel qualified medical evaluator pursuant to Section 4062.3 in advance of an evaluation obtained pursuant to Section 4062.1 or 4062.2.(2) This subdivision does not limit a party’s right to submit relevant information to a qualified medical evaluator pursuant to Section 4062.3.(c) The Division of Workers’ Compensation, acting in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter with an effective date of no later than January 1, 2027.